Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Clearance Requirements

65-6-201. Minimum clearance requirements.

The minimum clearance requirements for all railroads operating in this state, in the construction or relocation subsequent to April 13, 1949, of tracks, tunnels, bridges, or structures adjacent to tracks, shall be as described in this part, except as otherwise provided.

No railroad corporation shall operate any cars, trains, motors, engines, or other rolling equipment on its tracks, or tracks of others, except as provided in this part, on which overhead or side clearances, or clearances between tracks, are less than the minimum prescribed in this part, if such tracks, bridges, tunnels or structures adjacent to such track are constructed or relocated subsequent to April 13, 1949.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-623.

65-6-202. Part definitions.

For the purpose of this part, the following definitions will govern:

“Height” of a freight car is the distance between the top of the rail and the top of the running board;

“Overhead clearance” is the vertical distance between the two (2) rails from the level of the top of the highest rail to a structure or obstruction above on tangent track and from the mean level of the two (2) rails on curved track;

“Side” of a freight car is that part or appurtenance of the car at the maximum distance measured at right angles from the center line of the car;

“Side clearance” is the shortest distance from the center line of track to a structure or obstruction at the side of track up to a distance of fifteen feet (15') and six inches (6") from the top of the rail; and

“Width” of a freight car is twice the distance from the center line to the side of a car as defined in this section.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-624.

65-6-203. Overhead clearance.

The minimum overhead clearance above railroad tracks which are used or purported to be used for transporting freight cars shall be twenty-two feet (22'). Structures constructed prior to April 13, 1949, may be maintained at such clearance as was lawful at the time of construction.

The overhead clearance above the top of the rail of such tracks located inside of buildings may be reduced to seventeen feet (17'); provided, that this clearance shall apply only to tracks operating within the buildings; and provided further, that when an overhead clearance of less than twenty-two feet (22') exists on tracks inside such buildings, all cars, trains, motors, engines or equipment shall be brought to a stop before entering such buildings.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-625.

65-6-204. Side clearance.

The minimum side clearance from center line of standard gauge railroad tracks which are used or purported to be used for transporting freight cars, except as prescribed in this section, shall be as follows:

All structures and obstructions, except as specifically mentioned in this section, eight feet (8');

All posts, pipes, crossing signals, and similar obstructions, eight feet (8');

Platforms eight inches (8") or less above top of rail, four feet (4') and eight inches (8");

Platforms four feet (4') or less above top of rail, seven feet (7') and six inches (6"), except platforms of railroad freight warehouse stations and freight transfer points, which shall have a clearance of not less than five feet (5') and nine inches (9");

Platforms more than four feet (4') above top of rail used principally for loading and unloading refrigerator cars, eight feet (8');

Switch boxes, switch operating mechanisms, and accessories necessary for the control and operation of signals and interlockers, projecting four inches (4") or less above top of rail, three feet (3');

Low switch stands, dwarf signal stands and derail stands at center line of stand, six and one-half feet (6½');

All structural parts of railroad bridges shall have clearances which conform to the recommendation of the A.R.E.A. in effect when construction is begun;

The side clearances specified in this section shall not apply to mail cranes during such times as the arms of such cranes are supporting mail sacks for delivery; provided, that the top arm is not lower than ten feet (10') and eight inches (8") above top of rail and neither arm extends within six feet (6') and five inches (5") from the center line of track;

Icing platforms, seven feet (7'); and

All minimum side clearances prescribed in this section are for tangent tracks. All structures adjacent to curve tracks shall have an additional minimum side clearance compensated for the curvature. Structures constructed prior to April 13, 1949, may be maintained at such clearance as was lawful at the time of construction.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.4; Acts 1951, ch. 144, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-626.

65-6-205. Minimum distance between track.

The minimum distance between the center lines of parallel standard gauge tracks shall be fourteen feet (14') except as provided in this section.

The center line of any standard gauge ladder track, constructed parallel to any other adjacent track, shall have a clearance of not less than eighteen feet (18') from the center line of such other track.

The minimum distance between the center lines of parallel team, house and industry tracks shall be thirteen feet (13').

Tracks constructed prior to April 13, 1949, may be maintained at such clearance as was lawful at the time of construction.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-627.

Collateral References.

Preemptive effect of federal railroad safety act, exclusive of “essentially local safety or security hazard” savings clause. 44 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 261.

65-6-206. Clearance of articles stored near tracks.

No merchandise, material or other articles shall be placed or permitted to remain either on the ground or on the platforms adjacent to any track at a distance less than eight feet (8') from the center line of track; provided, that this provision does not apply to materials to be used in the repair, replacement or maintenance of the tracks.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-628.

65-6-207. Enforcement.

The department of transportation is directed to enforce compliance with this part; provided, that the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee shall have the power and the duty to prescribe and authorize a vertical or side clearance less than the minimum required in this part in particular cases when, on application therefor, after notice posted at the railroad station nearest the place affected, and after hearing if requested, the department of transportation may find a reasonable necessity or justification for such action; and provided further, that this part shall not apply to temporary forms, supports, falsework, bracing, etc., used only during and in the construction or repair of any underpass or overpass for a street, road or highway.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.7; Acts 1953, ch. 179, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-629; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 24.

65-6-208. Penalty for noncompliance.

Any railroad failing or refusing to comply with this part is subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. This penalty shall be enforced and collected as provided by this part. Any judgment rendered for such penalty may also contain an order by the court directing compliance.

Acts 1949, ch. 178, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 2670.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-630.